Hawaii statutes.
§338-13 Certified copies. (a) Subject
to the requirements of sections 338-16, 338-17, and 338-18, the department of
health shall, upon request, furnish to any applicant a certified copy of any
certificate, or the contents of any certificate, or any part thereof.

(b) Copies of the contents of any certificate
on file in the department, certified by the department shall be considered for
all purposes the same as the original, subject to the requirements of sections
338-16, 338-17, and 338-18.

(c) Copies may be made by photography, dry
copy reproduction, typing, computer printout or other process approved by the
director of health. [L 1949, c 327, §17; RL 1955, §57-16; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§19; HRS §338-13; am L 1978, c 49, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next